Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1475.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 2709.1(a) of Title 18 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended to read:§ 2709.1. Stalking.(a) Offense defined.--A person commits the crime of stalking when the person either:(1) engages in a course of conduct or repeatedly commits acts toward another person, including following the person without proper authority, [under circumstances which demonstrate either an intent to place such other person in reasonable fear of bodily injury or to cause substantial emotional distress to such other person; or] while knowingly or recklessly:(i) placing the other person in reasonable fear of 123456789101112131415161718 bodily injury; or(ii) causing substantial emotional distress to the other person; or(2) engages in a course of conduct or repeatedly communicates to another person [under circumstances which demonstrate or communicate either an intent to place such other person in reasonable fear of bodily injury or to cause substantial emotional distress to such other person.] while knowingly or recklessly:(i) placing the other person in reasonable fear of bodily injury; or(ii) causing substantial emotional distress to the other person.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1475PN2266 - 2 - 123456789101112131415